Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4313
Risk management pool; investment of funds.

The capital, surplus, and other funds, or any part thereof, of any risk management pool may be invested as authorized under the Insurers Investment Act for an insurer.

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 13;

Laws 1988, LB 1220, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 70;

Laws 2001, LB 664, § 4.

Insurers Investment Act, see section 44-5101.